apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="/diwar__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwar</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnon</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnout</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnañ</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnezhañ</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarni</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnezhi</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnomp</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarnoc’h</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diwarno</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
         <l>diwarne</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
		<l>diwarnezho</l>
          <r>diwar<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="diwar/-benn__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-benn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ma<b/>fenn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>da<b/>benn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>e<b/>benn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>he<b/>fenn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>hor<b/>penn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ho<b/>penn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>o<b/>fenn</l>
          <r>-benn<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	
	
    <pardef n="war/-lerc’h__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ma<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>da<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>e<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>he<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>hol<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ho<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>o<b/>lerc’h</l>
          <r>-lerc’h<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

    <pardef n="war/-giz__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-giz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ma<b/>c’hiz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>da<b/>giz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>e<b/>giz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>he<b/>c’hiz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>hor<b/>c’hiz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>hon<b/>giz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ho<b/>kiz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>o<b/>c’hiz</l>
          <r>-giz<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

	

    <e lm="diwar"><i></i><par n="/diwar__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="diwar-benn"><i>diwar</i><par n="diwar/-benn__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a ziàr-benn"><p><l>a<b/>ziàr</l><r>diwar</r></p><par n="diwar/-benn__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="war-giz"><i>war</i><par n="war/-giz__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="war-lerc’h"><i>war</i><par n="war/-lerc’h__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="àr-lerc’h" r="LR"><i>àr</i><par n="war/-lerc’h__pr"/></e>
